Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-315
State Board of Education; members; officers; Commissioner of Education; appointment; term; removal; seal; powers.

The State Board of Education shall elect from its own membership a president and a vice president and otherwise organize itself for the conduct of business. It shall then consider the appointment of and contracting for a Commissioner of Education whose appointment may be for a period of three years. During such term the commissioner may be removed from office for the causes set forth in subdivision (2) of section 79-318. The commissioner shall be the secretary of the board. The board shall reorganize itself each two years at its first meeting in the next calendar year following a general election. The board shall constitute a body corporate to be known as the State Board of Education, and as such it shall adopt and make use of a common seal and may receive, hold, and use money and real and personal property for the benefit of the school system of the state.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 5, p. 1055;

Laws 1969, c. 707, § 1, p. 2711;

Laws 1971, LB 525, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 654, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-325;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 143.